dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="j/o__pr">
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isane</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isane</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ise</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ise</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isako</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isako</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isase</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isase</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_liye</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_liye</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_xvArA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_xvArA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isameM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isameM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isapara</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isapara</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ina</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ina</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inheM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inheM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inako</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inako</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inase</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inase</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>inake_liye</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_liye</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_xvArA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_xvArA</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>inameM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inameM</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inapara</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inapara</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="jo"><i>j</i><par n="j/o__pr"/></e>
